New York, session 2025-2026, S7587.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 4141 of the public health law, as 2 amended by chapter 398 of the laws of 1997, is amended and a new subdi- 3 vision 5 is added to read as follows: 4 1. The certificate of death shall contain such information, including 5 but not limited to the decedent's social security number and whether 6 such decedent was in the custody of a law enforcement officer or correc- 7 tional facility at the time of death, and shall be in such form as the 8 commissioner may prescribe. As used in this section, the term "law 9 enforcement officer" means any public servant who is authorized to 10 conduct an investigation, prosecute or make an arrest for a criminal 11 offense. 12 5. Where a death occurs in the custody of a law enforcement officer or 13 correctional facility, such information shall be included in the public- 14 ly available statistics published on the website of the department. 15 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 16 have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment 17 and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation 18 of this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and 19 completed on or before such effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11744-01-5